Utah statutes.
19-9-115.   Tax exemption of property, income, and obligations of authority.

All property acquired or held by the authority is declared to be public property used for essential public and governmental purposes.  All property owned by the authority and all income derived from it is exempt from taxation by the state or its political subdivisions.  All principal and income derived by holders of obligations issued by the authority is also exempt from taxation by the state or its political subdivisions, except for the corporate franchise tax.

